Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-216
Military supplies; discrimination; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation, violating any of the provisions of section 48-215, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each violation of section 48-215 shall be a separate offense.

Laws 1943, c. 114, § 2, p. 400;

R.S.1943, § 48-216;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 276.